Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Children’s Internet Protection Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 302 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:

Req. No. 3504 Page 1


1. “Adult” means any person who is eighteen (18) years of age


or older;


2. “Broadband provider” has the same meaning as defined in 47


U.S.C., Section 1752(a)(2);


3. “Cloud service provider” has the same meaning as defined in


U.S.C., Section 3607(b)(5);


4. “Harmful to minors” has the same meaning as defined in


Section 1040.75 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. “Image” means a picture of a person;


6. “Interactive computer service” has the same meaning as


defined in 47 U.S.C., Section 230(f)(2);


7. “Likeness” mean means a physical, digital, or other


depiction or representation of a person;


8. “Minor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1040.75


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


9. “Name” means the first or last name, or the preferred name


of a person when used in a context that reasonably identifies the


person with particularity;


10. “Persona” refers to a person’s:


a. name,


b. likeness,


c. personal identifying information, or


d. precise geolocation data; and



Req. No. 3504 Page 2


11. “Personal identifying information” means any information,


including sensitive information, that is linked or reasonably


linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. The term


includes pseudonymous information when the information is used by a


controller or processor in conjunction with additional information


that reasonably links the information to an identified or


identifiable individual. The term does not include de-identified


information.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 303 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Interactive computer service providers shall not, without


the prior express consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian,


enter into any contractual agreement with a user who is a minor.


This prohibition includes, without limitation, any agreement with,


acknowledgment of, or consent to the interactive computer service’s


terms of service, terms of use, terms and conditions, or similar


agreement, however described. Any agreement entered into with a


minor, without the prior express consent of the minor’s parent or


legal guardian, is, from its inception and thereafter, null, void,


and of no effect. Any agreement entered into with a minor with the


consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian may not conflict


with the terms of this act. Any term or condition of such an


agreement entered into with a minor with the prior express consent

Req. No. 3504 Page 3


of the minor’s parent or legal guardian shall, to the extent it


conflicts with any provision or purpose of this act, be considered


void as against the public policy of this state and stricken from


the agreement.


B. Except as provided in subsections D and E of this section,


an interactive computer service provider that knowingly and


intentionally commits any of the following acts shall be liable for


the civil penalties and other remedies provided in Section 4 of this


act:


1. Purports to enter into a contract or agreement prohibited by


subsection A of this section without the prior express consent of


the minor user’s parent or legal guardian;


2. Allows a minor to access material harmful to minors using


the interactive computer service;


3. Makes any part of the persona of a minor accessible to other


persons using the interactive computer service; or


4. Allows an adult to use the interactive computer service to


communicate with a minor.


C. Any interactive computer service or third party that adheres


to the age verification requirements pursuant to subsection D of


this section shall not retain any identifying information of the


user after access has been granted to the interactive computer


service.



Req. No. 3504 Page 4


D. Subsections A and B of this section shall not apply to any


interactive computer service that performs reasonable age-


verification methods to verify the age of a user who obtains, in a


separate signed writing for each instance of conduct prohibited by


subsection A of this section, the consent of the minor’s parent or


legal guardian to the conduct in question.


E. 1. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any


bona fide news or public interest broadcast or report, and shall not


be construed to affect the rights of any news-gathering


organization.


2. No broadband provider, affiliate or subsidiary of a


broadband provider, search engine, or cloud service provider shall


be held to have violated the provisions of this section if enforcing


this section against the provider would be inconsistent with 47


U.S.C., Section 230.


F. An interactive computer service provider may only obtain the


express consent of a minor’s parent or legal guardian in compliance


with this section by one or more of the following methods:


1. Providing a form for the minor’s parent or legal guardian to


sign and return to the interactive computer service provider by


common carrier, facsimile, or electronic scan;


2. Providing a toll-free telephone number for the minor’s


parent or legal guardian to call to provide documented consent;



Req. No. 3504 Page 5


3. Coordinating a call with the minor’s parent or legal


guardian over videoconferencing technology;


4. Collecting information related to the government-issued


identification of the minor’s parent or legal guardian and deleting


that information after confirming the identity of the minor’s parent


or legal guardian;


5. Allowing the minor’s parent or legal guardian to provide


consent by responding to an email and taking additional steps to


verify the identity of the minor’s parent or legal guardian; or


6. Any other commercially reasonable method of obtaining


consent in light of available technology.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 304 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An interactive computer service provider that, having been


given no less than thirty (30) days’ notice by the Attorney General


that it is in violation of Section 3 of this act, continues to


knowingly violate Section 3 of this act, may be subject to action


brought by the Attorney General in the district court of Oklahoma


County or the district court in any county in which the minor user


accessed the interactive computer service in the course of conduct


that constitutes the violation of this act. The Attorney General


may seek to enjoin the violation, recover a civil penalty, or obtain


other relief the court considers appropriate.

Req. No. 3504 Page 6


B. A civil penalty imposed for a violation of Section 3 of this


act may be in an amount up to:


1. Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day that the


interactive computer service provider operates an interactive


computer service in violation of the age verification or parental


consent requirements of Section 3 of this act;


2. Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per instance when the


interactive computer service provider retains identifying


information in violation of subsection C of Section 3 of this act;


and


3. If, because of the interactive computer service provider’s


violation of the age verification or parental consent requirements


of Section 3 of this act:


a. one or more minors access material harmful to minors,


b. another person uses the interactive computer service


to access any part of the persona of a user who is a


minor, or


c. an adult uses the interactive computer service to


communicate with a user who is a minor,


an additional amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($250,000.00) per instance.


C. The amount of a civil penalty under this section shall be


based on:



Req. No. 3504 Page 7


1. The seriousness of the violation, including the nature,


circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation;


2. The history of previous violations;


3. The amount necessary to deter a future violation;


4. The economic effect of a civil penalty on the entity on whom


the civil penalty will be imposed;


5. The entity’s knowledge that the act constituted a violation


of Section 3 of this act; and


6. Any other matter that justice may require.


D. The Attorney General may recover reasonable attorney fees,


court costs, and expenses of litigation incurred in an action under


this section, including expert witness fees and court reporter fees.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3504 BRC 1/15/2026 9:20:29 AM



















Req. No. 3504 Page 8